src/fst/affixes/verb_inner_affixes.lexc
Multichar_Symbols @D.OBJECTPERSON@ @D.PREFIX@ @D.SUBJECTPERSON.4@ @D.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@ @P.DISTRIBUTIVE.OFF@ @P.DISTRIBUTIVE.ON@ @P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@ @R.DISTRIBUTIVE.OFF@ @R.DISTRIBUTIVE.ON@ @R.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@ @R.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @R.OBJECTPERSON@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.1@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.2@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.3@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.4@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.RECIP@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.REFL@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.INDEF@ @D.OBJECTPERSON.INDEF@ @R.PREFIX.INNER@ @R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@ @R.PREFIX.OUTER@ @R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ @R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@ @R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@ @U.ASPECT.IPFV@ @U.ASPECT.PFV@ @U.ASPECT.POT@ @U.ASPECT.PROG@ @U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@ @U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.1@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.2@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.3@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.4@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.RECIP@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.REFL@ @U.PREFIX.OUTER@ @U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ @U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@ @U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@ @U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@ @U.SUBJECTPERSON.4@ @U.TAMA.%0@ @U.TAMA.i@ @U.TAMA.isi@ @U.TAMA.ni@ @U.TAMA.si@ @U.TAMA.yi-a@ @U.TAMA.yi-y@ @U.TAMA.yi@ @U.VALENCE.DITRANSITIVE@ @U.VALENCE.OO-EXPERIENCER@ @U.VALENCE.IMPERSONAL@ @U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@ @U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@ @U.VALENCE.TRANSITIONAL@ @U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@ @U.VV.%0@ @U.VV.S@ @U.VV.I@ @D.VALENCE.TRANSITIONAL@ @D.OBJECTPERSON.3@ @D.SUBJECTPERSON.3@ @U.DIRECTOBJECT.GIVEN@ @D.DIRECTOBJECT.GIVEN@ @U.DIRECTOBJECT.EMPHATIC@ @D.DIRECTOBJECT.EMPHATIC@ @U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@ @U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@ @U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@ @R.LOWTONE.ON@ @D.LOWTONE@ i2 s2 ^L

LEXICON Root

@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIONAL@                                    TransitionalPrefix;
@D.VALENCE.TRANSITIONAL@                                    TAMA;


LEXICON TransitionalPrefix

! In 'transitional' transitive verbs, a ì- prefix (represented here by ^L)
! appears after any preceding prefixes and before the TAMA chunks iff a
! direct object is morphologically marked on the verb.  If a direct object
! is understood, but isn't morphologically marked, then the ì- doesn't appear,
! e.g.,
!
!   nàgimìnistàhí át'a "I will put them down (non-plural animate objects)"
!                       (nà= gimi_ ^L . nis tàhí ...)
!   tłích'áká nànistàhí át'a "I will put down, set down the (two) dogs"
!                       (nà= . nis tàhí ...)
!
! We rely on our direct object-related flag diacritics to catch the former
! cases and exclude the latter.  Direct object markers are present on verbs
! (and, hence, the ^L also appears here) when:
!
!   1. The direct object is non-3;
!   2. The direct object is 3PL and not given; or
!   3. The direct object is 3SG, and either
!       a. ...the subject is 3 (and isn't a given object), or
!       b. ...the subject is non-3, and the direct object is emphatic.

@D.OBJECTPERSON.3@^L                                            TAMA;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@D.DIRECTOBJECT.GIVEN@^L   TAMA;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.DIRECTOBJECT.GIVEN@     TAMA;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@D.DIRECTOBJECT.GIVEN@^L   TAMA;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@D.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.DIRECTOBJECT.EMPHATIC@^L TAMA;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@D.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@D.DIRECTOBJECT.EMPHATIC@  TAMA;


LEXICON TAMA

   0-IPFV  ;
  ni-IPFV  ;
  si-IPFV  ;
   i-IPFV  ;
 isi-IPFV  ;

  ni-PFV   ;
  si-PFV   ;
  yi-y-PFV ;
  yi-a-PFV ;
  isi-PFV  ;

  yi-PROG  ;

  yi-POT   ;


!
! 0-IPFV
!
LEXICON 0-IPFV
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@                   0-IPFV-AFF ;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-AFF
@U.VV.%0@@D.PREFIX@                          0-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                    0-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                   0-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                    0-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.VV.S@@D.PREFIX@                           0s-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                     0s-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                    0s-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                     0s-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.VV.I@@D.PREFIX@                           0i-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                     0i-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                    0i-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                     0i-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ni    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@i     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@i2saà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@i2siì    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@i2siì  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@as2   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@      #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@í     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@i     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@aà    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@iì     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@iì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@as2   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@i     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@i     #;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix
! 0-IPFV middle prefixes share the same TAMA forms as inner prefixes in all
! but two cases:
!
!   1. The indefinite direct object i- "something" is accompanied by inner-
!      affix-like TAMA forms in 2SG (e.g., ít'ùd "you (sg.) are smoking
!      (something)", rather than *init'ùd), but outer-affix-like forms
!      for 1PL (e.g., isaàt'ùd "we are smoking (something)", rather than
!      *aàt'ùd). 
!
!   2. The transitional/semelfactive/inchoative prefix ì- (represented in this
!      model as "^L"), when not preceded by an(other) inner affix, also appears
!      with inner-affix-like TAMA forms in 2SG (e.g., xáaʔò "you (sg.) will
!      carry it (solid object) past", rather than *xaniʔò), but outer-affix-
!      like forms for 1PL (e.g., xáasaàʔò "we will carry it (solid object)
!      past", rather than *xaàʔò).
!
! We use the OBJECTPERSON.INDEF and LOWTONE.ON flag diacritics to catch both
! of these cases.
@R.OBJECTPERSON.INDEF@                       0-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-DOIndef;
@R.LOWTONE.ON@                               0-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-DOIndef;
@D.OBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@D.LOWTONE@            0-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-DOIndef
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@í     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@i     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@i2saà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@i2siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@i2siì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@as2   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@i     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@i     #;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ni    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@i2saà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@i2siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@i2siì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@as2   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@      #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;


LEXICON 0s-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@i2saà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@i2siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@i2siì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@as2   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@is    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;

LEXICON 0s-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ís    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@aà    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@iì     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@iì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@as2   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@is    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;

LEXICON 0s-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix
@R.OBJECTPERSON.INDEF@                       0s-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-DOIndef;
@R.LOWTONE.ON@                               0s-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-DOIndef;
@D.OBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@D.LOWTONE@            0s-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix;

LEXICON 0s-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-DOIndef
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ís    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@i2saà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@i2siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@i2siì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@as2   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@is    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;

LEXICON 0s-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@i2saà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@i2siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@i2siì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@as2   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;


LEXICON 0i-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@i2saà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@i2siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@i2siì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@as2   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ii    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;

LEXICON 0i-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@íí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@aà    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@iì     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@iì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@as2   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ii    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;

LEXICON 0i-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix
@R.OBJECTPERSON.INDEF@                       0i-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-DOIndef;
@R.LOWTONE.ON@                               0i-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-DOIndef;
@D.OBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@D.LOWTONE@            0i-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix;

LEXICON 0i-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-DOIndef
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@íí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@i2saà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@i2siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@i2siì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@as2   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ii    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;
